Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4306
Collection of evidence; requirements.

Every health care professional as defined in section 44-5418 or any
person in charge of any emergency room in this state:

(1) Shall utilize a standardized sexual assault evidence collection
kit approved by the Attorney General; and

(2) Shall collect forensic evidence with the consent of the sexual assault or domestic violence victim
without separate authorization by a law enforcement agency. If the sexual assault or domestic violence victim is eighteen
years of age, the consent of or notification of the parent, parents, guardian,
or any other person having custody of the sexual assault or domestic violence
victim is not required.

Laws 2005, LB 713, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB479, § 1.